Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-804
Judicial nominating commissions; judges of Supreme Court; service as members.

Judges of the Supreme Court shall serve on as many judicial nominating commissions as may be necessary. Each judge of the Supreme Court shall be a member of at least three nominating commissions. The judge of the Supreme Court who serves as a member of a Supreme Court judicial nominating commission relating to a Supreme Court judicial district shall be a nonresident of that district. The Judge of the Supreme Court serving on a nominating commission for Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall be a judge of the Supreme Court other than the Chief Justice.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 4, p. 473.